ja: コンドームの種類: 女性; 男性; その他
bg-BG: Тип презерватив: Женски; Мъжки; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de preservativo: Feminino; Masculino; Outro
fi: Kondomityyppi: Naiset; Miehet; Muu
es: Tipo de condón: Femenino; Masculino; Otros
hu: Óvszer típusa: Női; Férfi; Egyéb
en: Condom type: Female; Male; Other
vi: Loại bao cao su: Nữ giới; Nam giới; Khác
sv: Kondomtyp: Dam; Herr; Övrigt
de: Kondomtyp: Weiblich; Männlich; Sonstiges
tr: Prezervatif Türü: Kadın; Erkek; Diğer
th: ประเภทถุงยางอนามัย: หญิง; ชาย; อื่นๆ
pl: Typ prezerwatywy: Kobieta; Mężczyzna; Inne
el: Τύπος προφυλακτικού: Γυναικείο; Ανδρικό; Άλλο
ru: Тип презерватива: Женский; Мужской; Другой
da: Kondomtype: Kvinde; Mand; Andet
sl-SI: Vrsta kondoma: Za ženske; Za moške; Drugo
pt-BR: Tipo de preservativo: Feminino; Masculino; Outro
it: Tipo di preservativo: Femmina; Maschio; Altro
ko: 콘돔 유형: 여성; 남성; 기타
hr-HR: Vrsta kondoma: Ženski; Muški; Ostalo
cs: Typ kondomu: Ženy; Muži; Jiné
zh-CN: 安全套类型: 女性; 男性; 其他
lt-LT: Prezervatyvo tipas: Moterims; Vyrams; Kita
nb: Type kondom: Dame; Mann; Annet
fr: Type de préservatif: Féminin; Masculin; Autre
nl: Condoomtype: Vrouwelijk; Mannelijk; Andere
sk-SK: Typ kondómu: Ženský; Mužský; Iné
ro-RO: Tip prezervativ: Feminin; Masculin; Altele
zh-TW: 保險套類型: 女性; 男性; 其他